test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_aad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - list: # from dictionary
  
    cirgáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cirgáám
    ciäggáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciäggáám
    ciähháđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ciähháá
    ciŋkkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ciŋkkáá
    curmáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: curmáám
    fiskáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: fiskájeh
    fiđgáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fiđgáám
    fiškáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fiškáám
    fáškáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fáškáám
    hiävláđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hiävláám
    hiäŋgáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hiäŋgáám
    hoittáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hoittáám
    hoksáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hoksáám
    hommáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hommáám
    huiláđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huiláám
    huttáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huttáám
    huuráđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huuráám
    huáttáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huáttáám
    háccáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: háccáám
    hámmáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hámmáám
    hárráđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hárráám
    iälláđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iälláám
    jottáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jottáám
    juumáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juumáá
    jááváđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jááváám
    killáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: killáám
    kipcáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kipcáám
    kiäigáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiäigáá
    koccáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koccáám
    kuhmáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuhmáám
    kuhnáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuhnáám
    kuikkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuikkáám
    kuittáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuittáám
    kuiváđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuiváám
    kuppáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuppáám
    kurppáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kurppáám
    kurráđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kurráá
    kuskáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuskáám
    kuáhtáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuáhtáám
    kuákkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuákkáám
    kuálkkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kuálkkájeh
    kuárváđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuárváám
    kuávváđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuávváám
    kuáŋkkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuáŋkkáám
    kárgáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kárgáám
    kávkkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kávkkáám
    kávkkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kávkkáá
    libžáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: libžáám
    lijmáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lijmáám
    livkkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: livkkáám
    liäbbáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: liäbbáám
    liässáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: liässáám
    liäškáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: liäškáám
    lonnjáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lonnjáám
    lulláđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lulláám
    luvráđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luvráám
    luávkkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luávkkáám
    luđgáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luđgáám
    miähkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: miähkájeh
    miäináđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: miäináám
    miästáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: miästáám
    moijáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: moijáám
    muvráđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muuvráám
    muvzáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muvzáám
    muáttáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muáttáá
    muštáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muštáám
    muččáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muččáám
    mássáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mássáám
    máttáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: máttáám
    mááláđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mááláám
    nirváđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nirváám
    njibžáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njibžáám
    njiäzzáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njiäzzáám
    njuigáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuigáám
    njuigáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuigáá
    njulppáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njulppáám
    njulččáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njulččáám
    nolláđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nolláám
    nottáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nottáám
    nurváđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nurváám
    pijssáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pijssáám
    piälkkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piälkkáám
    piäškáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piäškájeh
    piäškáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piäškáá
    poggáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: poggáám
    pooráđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pooráám
    puijáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puijáám
    pulláđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pulláám
    pulččáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pulččáám
    pumppáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pumppáám
    purccáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: purccáám
    purccáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: purccájeh
    puáccáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puáccáám
    puálláđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puálláám
    puŋkkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puŋkkáám
    pánttáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pánttáám
    párccáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: párccáám
    pássáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pássáám
    pávháđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pávhájeh
    pávkkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pávkkájeh
    páásáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: páásáám
    rijttáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rijttáám
    rijváđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rijváám
    rilláđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rilláám
    rimččáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rimččáám
    riäiháđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riäiháám
    riäiváđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riäiváám
    riännáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riännáám
    riänttáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riänttáám
    riččáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riččáám
    roškáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: roškáám
    ruibáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruibáám
    rundáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rundáám
    ruvgáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruvgáám
    ruvnáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruvnáám
    ruáibáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruáibáám
    ruámččáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruámččáám
    ruápsáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruápsáám
    ruáŋgáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruáŋgáám
    ruáškáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruáškáá
    ruškáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruškáám
    ruškáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ruškájeh
    ružžáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ružžáám
    ráiváđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ráiváám
    sivnáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sivnáám
    skilkkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skilkkáá
    skipčáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skipčáám
    skiämmáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skiämmáám
    skuálkkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: skuálkkájeh
    skuánnáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skuánnáám
    skuččáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuččáá
    snuvláđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: snuvláám
    sooláđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sooláám
    sorváđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sorváám
    sorččáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sorččáám
    spiđgáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: spiđgáám
    sponttáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sponttáám
    sponttáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sponttáá
    sruuváđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sruuváám
    stiiváđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stiiváám
    stijváđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stijváám
    stilččáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stilččáá
    stirccáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stirccáá
    stiämmáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stiämmáám
    stiärgáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stiärgáám
    storráđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: storráám
    stuppáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stuppáá
    sáhháđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sáhháám
    tiiláđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiiláám
    tilkkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tilkkáám
    tirráđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tirrájeh
    tiskáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiskáám
    tiälláđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiälláàm
    tiälláđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiälláám
    tiänáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiänáám
    tiäškáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiäškáám
    tiškáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tiškájeh
    tulláđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tulláám
    tuppáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuppáám
    turppáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: turppáám
    turppáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: turppáá
    tuumáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuumáám
    tuápsáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuápsáám
    tuápsáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuápsáá
    tuávláđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuávláám
    tuškáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tuškájeh
    tánssáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tánssáám
    táppáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: táppáám
    uáđđáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uáđđáám
    vijláđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vijláám
    vinttáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vinttáám
    vizzáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vizzáám
    viälgáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: viälgájeh
    viälláđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viälláám
    vuáppáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuáppáám
    vuáváđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuáváám
    várdáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: várdáám
    várváđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: várváám
    čirgáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čirgáám
    šiälgáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šiälgáám
    šiälláđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šiälláá
    šiärráđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šiärráám
    čiärsáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čiärsáám
    čiäskáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čiäskáám
    čiäskáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čiäskájeh
    čokkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čokkáám
    špiäigáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: špiäigájeh
    špuákkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: špuákkájeh
    čuináđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuináám
    čulkkáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čulkkáám
    čuppáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuppáám
    čurttáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čurttáám
    čuvváđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuvváám
    šuáláđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuáláá
    čuávjáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuávjáám
    čuávjáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čuávjájeh
    šuávváđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuávváá
    čuđgáđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuđgáám
    šááráđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šááráá
    šááváđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šááváá
